Utah statutes.
14-1-18 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Definitions -- Application of Procurement Code to payment and performance bonds.

(1) (a)  For purposes of this chapter, "political subdivision" means any county, city, town, school district, local district, special service district, community development and renewal agency, public corporation, institution of higher education of the state, public agency of any political subdivision, and, to the extent provided by law, any other entity which expends public funds for construction.

(b)  For purposes of applying Section 63G-6-505 to a political subdivision, "state" includes "political subdivision."

(2)  Section 63G-6-505 applies to all contracts for the construction, alteration, or repair of any public building or public work of the state or a political subdivision of the state.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

